Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
Article 9
Exemption

§ 1. Personal property exemptions of persons not heads of families.

The personal property of any resident of this State, who is not married or the head of a family, in specific articles to be selected by such resident, not exceeding in value the sum of two hundred dollars, in addition to his or her wearing apparel, shall be exempt from seizure on attachment, or sale on execution or other process from any court, issued for the collection of any debt by contract: Provided, That no property shall be exempt from execution for debts contracted for the purchase money therefor while in the hands of the vendee.

§ 2. Heads of families — Exempt personal property.

The personal property of any resident of this State, who is married or the head of a family, in specific articles to be selected by such resident, not exceeding in value the sum of five hundred dollars, in addition to his or her wearing apparel, and that of his or her family, shall be exempt from seizure on attachment, or sale on execution or other process from any court, on debt by contract.

§ 3. Homestead exemption from legal process — Exceptions.

The homestead of any resident of this State, who is married or the head of a family, shall not be subject to the lien of any judgment or decree of any court, or to sale under execution, or other process thereon, except such as may be rendered for the purchase money, or for specific liens, laborers' or mechanics' liens for improving the same, or for taxes, or against executors, administrators, guardians, receivers, attorneys for moneys collected by them, and other trustees of an express trust, for moneys due from them in their fiduciary capacity.

Cross References.

Homestead Exemption Act of 1981, § 16-66-210.

Partition.

A homestead exemption cannot be claimed in a partition suit against a cotenant. Best v. Williams, 260 Ark. 30, 537 S.W.2d 793 (1976).

§ 4. Rural homestead — Acreage — Value.

The homestead outside any city, town or village, owned and occupied as a residence, shall consist of not exceeding one hundred and sixty acres of land, with the improvements thereon, to be selected by the owner; Provided, The same shall not exceed in value the sum of twenty-five hundred dollars, and in no event shall the homestead be reduced to less than eighty acres, without regard to value.

Cross References.

Homestead Exemption Act of 1981, § 16-66-210.

§ 5. Urban homestead — Acreage — Value.

The homestead in any city, town or village, owned and occupied as a residence, shall consist of not exceeding one acre of land, with the improvements thereon, to be selected by the owner; provided, the same shall not exceed in value the sum of two thousand five hundred dollars, and in no event shall such homestead be reduced to less than one-quarter of an acre of land, without regard to value.

Cross References.

Homestead Exemption Act of 1981, § 16-66-210.

§ 6. Rights of widow and children.

If the owner of a homestead die, leaving a widow, but no children, and said widow has no separate homestead in her own right, the same shall be exempt, and the rents and profits thereof shall vest in her during her natural life; Provided, That if the owner leaves children, one or more, said child or children shall share with said widow, and be entitled to half the rents and profits till each of them arrives at twenty-one years of age — each child's rights to cease at twenty-one years of age — and the shares to go to the younger children; and then all to go to the widow; and, provided, that said widow or children may reside on the homestead or not. And in case of the death of the widow, all of said homestead shall be vested in the minor children of the testator or intestate.

Publisher's Notes.

In Hess v. Wims, 272 Ark. 43, 613 S.W.2d 85 (1981), this section, as applied, was held to violate the equal protection clause of the U.S. Constitution in that it discriminated between widows and widowers. See also Stokes v. Stokes, 271 Ark. 300, 613 S.W.2d 372 (1981). For current, gender-neutral homestead exemption act, see § 16-66-210.

Partition.

Where husband was a cotenant at his death, only owning one-third interest in property, wife's homestead interest was in only one-third of the lot and the other cotenants had the right to seek partition of their interest. Allen v. Smith, 282 Ark. 401, 669 S.W.2d 5 (1984).

§ 7. Married woman's separate property — Right of disposition — Not liable for debts of husband.

The real and personal property of any femme covert in this State, acquired either before or after marriage, whether by gift, grant, inheritance, devise or otherwise, shall, so long as she may choose, be and remain her separate estate and property, and may be devised, bequeathed or conveyed by her the same as if she were a femme sole; and the same shall not be subject to the debts of her husband.

§ 8. Scheduling separate personal property of wife.

The General Assembly shall provide for the time and mode of scheduling the separate personal property of married women.

Cross References.

Method of scheduling property, §§ 9-11-501, 9-11-509 — 9-11-514.

§ 9. Exemptions under Constitution of 1868 — Existing obligations.

The exemptions contained in the Constitution of 1868 shall apply to all debts contracted since the adoption thereof, and prior to the adoption of this Constitution.

Publisher's Notes.

This Constitution was ratified by the people October 13, 1874, and its adoption was proclaimed October 30, 1874. See Proclamation by state board of election supervisors, following Schedule to Constitution.

A constitutional convention was held in accordance with Acts 1977 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 3, as amended by Acts 1979, No. 622, and a new constitution was proposed. The proposed constitution was defeated at the general election held November 4, 1980. Returns: For 276,257; Against 464,210.

§ 10. Homestead rights of minor children.

The homestead provided for in this article shall inure to the benefit of the minor children, under the exemptions herein provided, after the decease of the parents.

Cross References.

Homestead Exemption Act of 1981, § 16-66-210.

Rights of spouse or child, § 28-39-201.